02_Morphology/eng.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<m%>
LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;


LEXICON CASE
# ;
%<pos%>:%>'s #; ! 

LEXICON Nouns

cat:cat N ;
dog:dog N ;
eggplant:eggplant N ;
hamster:hamster N ;
kid:kid N ;
mother:mother N ;
father:father N ;
hair:hair N ;
can:can N ;
pen:pen N ;
cup:cup N ;
phone:phone N ;
controller:controller N ;
television:television N ;
plate:plate N ;
paper:paper N ;
pencil:pencil N ;
light:light N ;
bed:bed N ;
door:door N ;
